Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
ARTICLE 23
OUTFITTERS, GUIDES, AND ASSISTANT GUIDES

33-23-101 to 33-23-108. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article repealed, p. 1292, § 2, effective April 21.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 9 of chapter 62, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1983, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For the regulation of outfitters, see article 145 of title 12; for the regulation of river outfitters, see article 32 of this title.